Utah statutes.
58-41-14.   Single license for speech-language pathologist and audiologist -- Single fee.

An applicant who qualifies to be licensed as both a speech-language pathologist and audiologist shall receive a single license reflecting licensure in both classifications.  A fee may only be assessed for a single license.

